New Jersey, session 222, S3713.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A carrier shall not make a change to a contract between the carrier and its network providers that would reduce the reimbursement to a provider during the term of the contract. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next and shall be applicable to contracts entered into or renewed on or after the effective date.